Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2408
Grants; use.

(1) Grants provided under the Commission Grant Program may be used for developing programs under the Juvenile Services Act.

(2) No grants from the Commission Grant Program shall be used to acquire, develop, build, or improve local correctional facilities.

Laws 1990, LB 663, § 8;

Laws 2000, LB 1167, § 46;

Laws 2001, LB 640, § 10.